Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.30.644

Climate and rural energy development center—Funding.

The center shall be funded through grants, and voluntary monetary and in-kind contributions.

[ 2002 c 250 s 4.]

NOTES:

Findings—Effective date—2002 c 250: See notes following RCW 28B.30.640.